Hawaii statutes.
§501-103 Conveyances of less than fee
simple. No new certificate shall be entered or issued upon any transfer of
registered land which does not divest the title in fee simple from the owner or
one of the registered owners. Except as provided in sections 501-241 to
501-248, all interests in registered land less than an estate in fee simple
shall contain a reference to the document number of the interest acquired and
shall be registered by recording with the assistant registrar the instrument
creating or transferring or claiming such interest, and by a brief memorandum
thereof made by the assistant registrar upon the certificate of title, and
signed by the assistant registrar. Except as provided in sections 501-241 to
501-248, the cancellation or extinguishment of such interests shall be recorded
in the same manner. [L 1903, c 56, §52; RL 1925, §3241; RL 1935, §5051; RL
1945, §12651; RL 1955, §342-52; HRS §501-103; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 246,
§5; am L 1988, c 346, §7; am L 1993, c 18, §2; am L 1998, c 219, §8]

Revision Note

"Sections 501-241 to 501-248" substituted for
"chapter 501, part ".

Rules of Court

Certificates of title, see Rules of the Land Court, part II.

Case Notes

Cited: 35 H. 816, 823.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next